Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4627
Method of release.

A powerholder of a releasable power of appointment may release the power in whole or in part:

(1) by substantial compliance with a method provided in the terms of the instrument creating the power; or

(2) if the terms of the instrument creating the power do not provide a method or the method provided in the terms of the instrument is not expressly made exclusive, by a record manifesting the powerholder's intent by clear and convincing evidence.

Laws 2021, LB501, § 50.